Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.050

Compensation and reimbursement for administering examination.

Commission members shall be compensated and reimbursed pursuant to this section for their activities in administering a multistate licensing examination pursuant to the commission's compact or agreement with another state or states or with organizations formed by several states.

[ 1995 c 198 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 212; 1984 c 287 s 30; 1979 c 38 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 34; 1967 c 188 s 2; 1957 c 52 s 23; 1953 c 93 s 3. Prior: 1935 c 112 s 11, part; RRS s 10031-11, part.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.